District of Columbia statutes.
22-3234

Altering or removing bicycle identification numbers.

(a)

It is unlawful for a person to knowingly remove, obliterate, tamper with, or alter any identification number on a bicycle or bicycle part.

(b)

Any person who violates subsection (a) of this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be imprisoned for not more than 180 days, or fined not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01, or both.

(c)

For the purposes of this section, the term:

(1)

“Bicycle” shall have the same meaning as provided in § 50-1609(1).

(2)

“Identification number” shall have the same meaning as provided in § 50-1609(1A).

History

Dec. 1, 1982, D.C. Law 4-164, § 134
as added May 1, 2008, D.C. Law 17-149, § 3, 55 DCR 1272
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 205(r), 60 DCR 2064

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01” for “not more than $1,000” in (b).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 205(r) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.